Alabama, session 2026rs, HB426.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
46 Section 1. Chapter 21, commencing with Section 35-21-1,
47 is added to Title 35, Code of Alabama 1975, to read as
48 follows:
49 §35-21-1
50 (a) This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the
51 Alabama Property Protection Act of 2026.
52 (b) The Legislature finds that protecting private
53 property owners from seller impersonation fraud and other
54 forms of title fraud, and ensuring swift remedies when real
55 property is fraudulently conveyed, are essential to the public
56 interest and to the integrity of Alabama's property records
Page 2

interest and to the integrity of Alabama's property records
HB426 Engrossed
57 and real estate market.
58 §35-21-2
59 For the purposes of this chapter, the term "commission"
60 means the Alabama Securities Commission.
61 §35-21-3
62 (a) The commission shall have authority to investigate
63 claims and administer, implement, and enforce the law under
64 this chapter with respect to all regulated conduct,
65 individuals, and entities described herein, regardless of
66 licensure under any other provision of law. This authority
67 shall not preclude other professional licensing authorities
68 from pursuing professional licensing violations under Chapter
69 25 of Title 27, Chapter 3 of Title 34, Chapter 27 of Title 34,
70 or Chapter 20 of Title 36.
71 (b) The commission may adopt rules necessary to carry
72 out this chapter, including, but not limited to, rules
73 governing:
74 (1) Consumer complaint intake and resolution
75 procedures;
76 (2) Disclosure forms and content;
77 (3) Examination, reporting, and recordkeeping
78 requirements;
79 (4) Fees, fines, penalty schedules, and remedial
80 measures established by rule;
81 (5) A means of giving constructive notice of the
82 commission's administrative orders to third parties in a
83 central location or searchable database; and
84 (6) Definitions and standards necessary to prevent
Page 3

(6) Definitions and standards necessary to prevent
HB426 Engrossed
85 circumvention of this chapter.
86 (c) The commission may:
87 (1) Conduct investigations and examinations and issue
88 administrative orders detailing its findings;
89 (2) Require the production of documents and testimony;
90 (3) Issue subpoenas;
91 (4) Issue cease and desist orders;
92 (5) Impose administrative fines and penalties per
93 violation;
94 (6) Order restitution, rescission, disgorgement, or
95 other remedial relief;
96 (7) Prosecute criminal violations where authorized by
97 law; and
98 (8) Coordinate with other agencies as authorized by
99 law.
100 (d) The commission may bring an action in any court of
101 appropriate jurisdiction to obtain an order imposing:
102 (1) Injunctive or other relief;
103 (2) Civil penalties;
104 (3) Restitution, rescission, or disgorgement;
105 (4) Enforcement of administrative orders;
106 (5) Recovery of investigative and enforcement costs;
107 and
108 (6) Appointment of a receiver.
109 (e) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit
110 criminal prosecution under any law or to require exhaustion of
111 administrative remedies prior to criminal enforcement.
112 (f) Nothing in this chapter shall apply to the
Page 4

(f) Nothing in this chapter shall apply to the
HB426 Engrossed
113 acquisition of real property, easements, or rights-of-way for
114 utility infrastructure.
115 §35-21-4
116 (a) When the commission determines, after receiving a
117 complaint and conducting an investigation, that a real
118 property or real estate conveyance occurred as a result of a
119 criminal act or fraud, any proceeds derived from the
120 fraudulent conveyance may be forfeited and deposited into the
121 Alabama Title Fraud Recovery Fund established under Section
122 8-6-61. No person or individual may profit by retaining
123 proceeds from such a conveyance. Bank, credit union, title
124 insurer, state or local government fees, or principal and
125 interest payments to a lender may not be included in
126 forfeiture.
127 (b) This act does not limit the right to bring civil or
128 equitable actions that may lawfully arise under existing
129 Alabama laws.
130 (c) The commission shall have the authority to
131 administratively determine land fraud and fraudulent
132 conveyance under this chapter. Nothing in this chapter shall
133 limit the jurisdiction of the circuit court to hear de novo
134 appeals or to grant equitable relief consistent with a final
135 administrative order of the commission.
136 35-21-5
137 (a) A real estate agent or broker licensed under
138 Chapter 27 of Title 34 may not enter into an agreement to sell
139 or lease real property when the seller is unknown to the real
140 estate agent or broker and is not physically present to meet
Page 5

estate agent or broker and is not physically present to meet
HB426 Engrossed
141 with the real estate agent or broker, unless the seller
142 provides government-issued identification and ownership
143 records of the real property.
144 (b) Prior to closing any transfer of Class III
145 properties, as defined in Section 40-8-1, a settlement agent
146 shall conduct identity document validation and identity
147 verification of the seller of real property that is vacant or
148 not owner-occupied and unencumbered by a security instrument.
149 (c) Documentation demonstrating compliance with this
150 section shall constitute an affirmative defense to a civil
151 claim brought under this chapter. The existence of this
152 affirmative defense shall be a question of law for the court
153 and may be decided on a motion for summary judgment.
154 (d) The documentation demonstrating compliance required
155 under this section shall be maintained for five years. Any
156 civil action against a real estate agent, broker, or
157 settlement agent arising from a transfer of real property
158 shall be commenced no later than four years after the date the
159 transfer is recorded in the public records.
160 §35-21-6
161 (a) The commission may fund a statewide real property
162 notification alert system that notifies a real property owner
163 by text or email when a recording is made on his or her real
164 property.
165 (b) The commission may provide training and assistance
166 to any municipal, county, or state entity, their staff, and
167 real property owners on real estate fraud prevention and
168 consumer education.
Page 6

consumer education.
HB426 Engrossed
169 §35-21-7
170 The expedited quiet title process established in
171 Section 6-6-540 applies to transactions in this chapter.
172 §35-21-8
173 (a) Upon receipt of a complaint alleging land fraud or
174 a fraudulent conveyance, the commission may investigate the
175 matter using all authority granted under this chapter.
176 (b) If the commission determines that a real property
177 conveyance resulted from a criminal act or fraud involving the
178 true ownership of the real property, the commission may issue
179 a final administrative order declaring the conveyance void.
180 The commission, in the same order, may impose civil penalties,
181 order restitution or disgorgement, and assess any other
182 remedies authorized by law.
183 (c) A final administrative order issued by the
184 commission declaring a conveyance void shall be legally
185 binding and enforceable. The administrative order shall not be
186 stayed except by order of the circuit court in a timely filed
187 de novo appeal.
188 (d) Upon issuance of a final administrative order, the
189 commission shall serve a copy of the order by certified mail
190 upon the complainant and all parties to the proceeding. The
191 complainant may file a certified copy of the final
192 administrative order in the circuit court of the county where
193 the real property is located for purposes of enforcement and
194 quiet title relief.
195 §35-21-9
196 (a) Any party aggrieved by a final administrative order
Page 7

(a) Any party aggrieved by a final administrative order
HB426 Engrossed
197 of the commission may seek judicial review by filing an appeal
198 in the circuit court of the county where the real property is
199 located no later than 30 days after the date of the final
200 administrative order. The circuit court shall apply a de novo
201 standard of review.
202 (b) The circuit court shall conduct a de novo review of
203 the commission's determination and may affirm, modify, or
204 vacate the order.
205 §35-21-10
206 (a) If no timely appeal is filed, the circuit court,
207 upon a quiet title petition by the complainant with a copy of
208 the administrative order attached, shall enter an order
209 enforcing the final administrative order no later than 30 days
210 from the filing date of the quiet title petition without
211 further evidentiary hearing or procedural delay. The court may
212 waive the filing fees and court costs for good cause shown.
213 The enforcement order shall:
214 (1) Declare the fraudulent conveyance or attempted
215 conveyance void;
216 (2) Direct the judge of probate to nullify any recorded
217 instrument that clouds title or conflicts with the
218 administrative order; and
219 (3) Quiet title in favor of the rightful real property
220 owner.
221 (b) Upon receipt of a quiet title enforcement order
222 issued to the circuit court pursuant to this section, the
223 judges of probate shall promptly record the circuit court
224 order and administrative order.
Page 8

order and administrative order.
HB426 Engrossed
225 (c) The judge of probate may comply with an enforcement
226 order under this section by recording the enforcement order in
227 the official real property records and making a marginal
228 notation on the voided instrument referencing the recorded
229 order, or making a cross reference to the voided instrument
230 when recording the enforcement order.
231 §35-21-11
232 (a) When the commission determines, after receiving a
233 complaint and conducting an investigation, that a real
234 property or real estate conveyance occurred as a result of a
235 criminal act or fraud, any proceeds derived from the
236 fraudulent conveyance may be ordered to be forfeited and
237 deposited into the Alabama Title Fraud Recovery Fund
238 established under Section 8-6-61, unless otherwise ordered by
239 the circuit court.
240 (b) This section does not limit the right to bring
241 civil or equitable actions that may lawfully arise under
242 existing Alabama laws.
243 (c) Any person who knowingly fails to remit proceeds
244 from a fraudulent conveyance or files frivolous litigation to
245 delay enforcement may be assessed an additional civil penalty
246 of ten thousand dollars ($10,000), payable to the Alabama
247 Title Fraud Recovery Fund.
248 §35-21-12
249 The crimes of fraudulent sale or lease of residential
250 real property or aggravated fraudulent conveyance of real
251 property established in Article 1, Chapter 9 of Title 13A does
252 not preclude the state from pursuing additional criminal
Page 9

not preclude the state from pursuing additional criminal
HB426 Engrossed
253 prosecution as authorized by law.
254 Section 2. Sections 8-6-61, 12-13-55, and 13A-9-23 are
255 added to the Code of Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
256 §8-6-61
257 (a) There is established in the State Treasury an
258 Alabama Title Fraud Recovery Fund to be administered by the
259 Alabama Securities Commission in accordance with this section.
260 The fund shall be budgeted and allotted in accordance with
261 Article 4 of Chapter 4 of Title 41 and Chapter 19 of Title 41.
262 (b) Money in the fund shall only be used to compensate
263 individuals injured by title conveyance fraud for actual
264 economic damages, excluding interest and court costs, incurred
265 by the injured party. Payments from the fund are subject to
266 the following limitations and conditions:
267 (1) The fund shall only make payments to real property
268 owners who file a complaint with the commission as required by
269 this section.
270 (2) The fund shall not issue payments based on consent
271 judgments.
272 (c) The commission, by rule, shall set the maximum
273 payment amount that can be issued from the fund to a
274 complainant.
275 (d) Any person with a claim for title conveyance fraud
276 may submit a written complaint to the commission, which may
277 investigate the complaint.
278 (e) During the investigation of a complaint, the
279 commission may:
280 (1) Hold hearings;
Page 10

(1) Hold hearings;
HB426 Engrossed
281 (2) Subpoena witnesses;
282 (3) Administer oaths;
283 (4) Examine any individual under oath; and
284 (5) Compel the production of records, books, papers,
285 contracts, or other documents.
286 (f) If an individual fails to comply with a subpoena
287 issued by the commission or to testify on matters for which
288 the individual may be questioned under this section, the
289 commission may petition a court of competent jurisdiction for
290 enforcement.
291 (g) If the commission determines that a person is
292 liable for fraudulent title conveyance, the commission may
293 take any of the following actions:
294 (1) Issue an administrative order declaring the
295 conveyance void pursuant to Chapter 21 of Title 35.
296 (2) Impose a civil penalty of up to one hundred
297 thousand dollars ($100,000) per transaction on the liable
298 person or persons who have committed the fraud, which shall be
299 deposited into the Alabama Title Fraud Recovery Fund.
300 (h) Any final order issued by the commission shall be
301 legally binding and shall not be stayed except by order of the
302 circuit court in a timely filed appeal. Any party dissatisfied
303 with a final judgment or decision by the commission may appeal
304 to the circuit court where the property is located no later
305 than 30 days from the date of the final administrative order
306 of the Alabama Securities Commission. For appeals, the
307 commission shall provide a certified transcript of the
308 proceedings and actions taken by the commission to the circuit
Page 11

proceedings and actions taken by the commission to the circuit
HB426 Engrossed
309 court to which the appeal is taken.
310 (i) The judge of probate may comply with an
311 administrative order under this section by recording the
312 enforcement order in the official real property records and
313 making a marginal notation on the voided instrument
314 referencing the recorded order, or by making a cross reference
315 to the voided instrument when recording the administrative
316 order.
317 (j) (1) Nothing in this chapter shall apply to the
318 acquisition of real property, easements, or rights-of-way for
319 utility infrastructure.
320 (2) Banks, credit unions, title insurers, and state or
321 local governments shall not be subject to civil penalties
322 under this section.
323 §12-13-55
324 (a) In cooperation with the Alabama Securities
325 Commission, each judge of probate may establish a real
326 property owner notification service that informs owners of
327 real property in the county whenever a document is recorded in
328 the name of the real property owner or the address of the real
329 property owner registered with the recording clerk where the
330 property is located.
331 (b) Once established, the property owner notification
332 service shall be free and available to any property owner who
333 owns real property in the county.
334 (c) A judge of probate, the commission, or a third-
335 party provider shall not be liable for failure to provide
336 notice under this section.
Page 12

notice under this section.
HB426 Engrossed
337 §13A-9-23
338 (a) A person commits the crime of aggravated fraudulent
339 sale or lease of residential real property if, with the intent
340 to defraud:
341 (1) The person either: (i) lists, advertises, or causes
342 the listing or advertisement of residential real property for
343 sale knowing that the person or the purported seller has no
344 legal title or authority to sell the real property; or (ii)
345 rents, leases, or causes the rental or leasing of real
346 property knowing the person or the purported lessor has no
347 legal ownership or authority to lease the property; and
348 (2) Either: (i) the person received funds related to
349 the sale or lease; or (ii) the property is owned individually
350 or jointly by an individual who is 70 years of age or older.
351 (b) Aggravated fraudulent sale of real property is a
352 Class C felony.
353 Section 3. Chapter 19J, commencing with Section
354 8-19J-1, is added to Title 8, Code of Alabama 1975, to read as
355 follows:
356 Chapter 19J
357 §8-19J-1
358 For the purposes of this chapter, the term "online real
359 estate platform" means: (i) a digital media platform whose
360 primary business purpose is to publicly advertise real estate
361 for sale or lease; or (ii) a real estate website whose primary
362 purpose is publicly advertising real estate for sale or lease.
363 For purposes of this chapter, an online real estate platform
364 does not include:
Page 13

does not include:
HB426 Engrossed
365 (1) Nonpublic websites, portals, list serves, social
366 media websites, or news sites.
367 (2) Multiple listing services operated by or on behalf
368 of licensed real estate brokers and accessible only to
369 licensed real estate professionals and their clients; or
370 (3) Internal business tools that do not provide a
371 public-facing listing search experience to the general public.
372 §8-19J-2
373 (a) For a listing that originates from an online real
374 estate platform through a direct contract with the property
375 owner and is not first listed with a licensed real estate
376 broker, real estate brokerage, or multiple listing service,
377 the platform shall require the following before publishing,
378 hosting, advertising, or otherwise publicly disseminating real
379 property for sale or lease:
380 (1) A copy of the owner's government-issued
381 identification that is unexpired and includes the individual's
382 photograph, name, and address.
383 (2) A copy of the official county recorder's records
384 showing the owner of record, a copy of the deed to the real
385 property with the owner's name, or a title history.
386 (b) An online real estate platform may satisfy the
387 requirements of this section by using a third-party identity
388 or title verification service.
389 §8-19J-3
390 (a) An online real estate platform may display,
391 publish, host, advertise, or otherwise distribute interior
392 photos or videos of real property that is not currently listed
Page 14

photos or videos of real property that is not currently listed
HB426 Engrossed
393 for sale, subject to the requirements of this section.
394 (b) The current owner of record of real property may
395 submit a written request to an online real estate platform to
396 remove interior photos or videos of the owner's property from
397 public display.
398 (c) Upon receipt of a request submitted pursuant to
399 subsection (b), the online real estate platform shall:
400 (1) Verify the identity and ownership status of the
401 requesting party through reasonable means; and
402 (2) Remove the interior photos or videos from public
403 display within 30 days after verification of ownership.
404 (d) Nothing in this section shall require an online
405 real estate platform to remove interior photos or videos
406 absent a request from the current property owner.
407 (e) This section shall not be construed to prohibit the
408 retention of interior photos or videos for archival, legal
409 compliance, fraud prevention, or internal business purposes,
410 provided such photos or videos are not publicly displayed
411 after a valid removal request.
412 §8-19J-4
413 (a) An online real estate platform that follows the
414 practices outlined in Sections 8-19J-2 and 8-19J-3 shall
415 create a rebuttable presumption that the platform acted
416 reasonably. Such adherence does not preclude administrative
417 action by the commission. The existence of the presumption
418 shall be a question of law for the court and may be determined
419 on a motion for summary judgment.
420 (b) An action under this chapter against an online real
Page 15

(b) An action under this chapter against an online real
HB426 Engrossed
421 estate platform shall be commenced no later than four years
422 after the date the transfer is recorded in the public record.
423 (c) An online real estate platform may not be liable
424 for negligence arising from a syndicated listing or from an
425 intermediary agent or broker that fails to obtain property
426 documentation before listing real property.
427 §8-19J-5
428 No Internet service provider, or its affiliates or
429 subsidiaries, search engine, or cloud service provider shall
430 be considered to have violated this chapter solely for
431 providing access or connection to or from a website, to
432 content on the Internet, or to a facility, system, or network
433 not under that provider's control, including transmission,
434 download, intermediate storage, or access software.
435 Section 4. Sections 6-6-540, 6-6-545, 6-6-571, 13A-9-12
436 13A-9-22, 36-20-73, and 36-20-73.1, Code of Alabama 1975, are
437 amended to read as follows:
438 "§6-6-540
439 (a) When any person is in peaceable possession of
440 lands, whether actual or constructive, claiming to own the
441 same, in his or her own right or as a personal representative
442 or guardian, and his or her title thereto, or any part
443 thereof, is denied or disputed or any other person claims or
444 is reputed to own the same, any part thereof, or any interest
445 therein or to hold any lien or encumbrance thereon and no
446 action is pending to enforce or test the validity of such the
447 title, claim, or encumbrance, such the person or his or her
448 personal representative or guardian, so in possession, may
Page 16

personal representative or guardian, so in possession, may
HB426 Engrossed
449 commence an action to settle the title to such lands and to
450 clear up all doubts or disputes concerning the same.
451 (b)(1) An expedited quiet title action against a parcel
452 of real property may be maintained under this article based on
453 a fraudulent title conveyance allegation. All actions to quiet
454 title based on fraudulent title conveyance allegations must be
455 brought in the circuit court where the real property is
456 located which shall have equitable jurisdiction pursuant to
457 Section 12-11-31.
458 (2)a. A petitioner bringing an action to quiet title
459 based on fraudulent title conveyance allegations is entitled
460 to an expedited procedure. The court shall set the date, time,
461 and place for a preliminary hearing on the petition no later
462 than 30 days from service of the complaint.
463 b. In an expedited action to quiet title under this
464 section, when the court determines that an attempt was made to
465 fraudulently convey the land at issue from a plaintiff who had
466 legal title to the land before the conveyance, the court shall
467 quiet title in and award the plaintiff with the same title and
468 rights to the land that the plaintiff enjoyed before the
469 attempted conveyance.
470 (3) A petitioner may file a single petition with the
471 clerk of the circuit court for the judicial circuit in which
472 the subject property is located for an order to quiet title
473 and expedite foreclosure to one or more parcels of real
474 property under this section. The petition shall identify each
475 parcel by its legal description, tax parcel number, and street
476 address, if available.
Page 17

address, if available.
HB426 Engrossed
477 (4) The Administrative Office of Courts shall provide a
478 simplified form for the filing of a complaint to quiet title
479 based on a fraudulent title conveyance allegation and
480 instructions for completing the form."
481 "§6-6-545
482 (a) No judgment for costs shall be had under this
483 division against a defendant who suffers a judgment by default
484 against him against whom a plaintiff receives a default
485 judgment or who, in his or her answer, disclaims all title to,
486 interest in, or encumbrance on the lands; but the. The court
487 shall, in those cases, and without further proof, shall
488 adjudge that such the defendant has no estate or interest in
489 or encumbrance on such lands, or any part thereof. Any
490 defendant who shall, by answer under oath, deny denies that he
491 or she claims, or ever has claimed, or pretended to have any
492 estate, interest, or encumbrance in, or upon, such lands, or
493 any part thereof of the lands, shall be entitled to recover
494 his or her costs in the action.
495 (b) In any case where the court finds that the
496 defendant fraudulently created or caused to be created the
497 instrument that is sought to be cancelled, the plaintiff shall
498 be entitled to recover all costs, including reasonable
499 attorney fees, incurred in bringing the action to cancel the
500 instrument."
501 "§6-6-571
502 (a) The court shall have the power to may assess the
503 cost of a hearing held pursuant to the terms of this division,
504 including the fee of the guardian ad litem, to the
Page 18

including the fee of the guardian ad litem, to the
HB426 Engrossed
505 plaintiffs;, provided, that should some of the defendants file
506 that if any defendant files counterclaims or should certain
507 persons intervene any person intervenes, the cost shall be
508 assessed by the court as justice may require.
509 (b) In any case where it is found that the defendant
510 fraudulently created the instrument that is sought to be
511 canceled, the plaintiff shall be entitled to recover all
512 costs, including reasonable attorney fees, incurred in
513 bringing the action to cancel the instrument."
514 "§13A-9-12
515 (a) A person commits the crime of offering a false
516 instrument for recording if, knowing that a written instrument
517 relating to or affecting real or personal property, or an
518 interest therein, or directly affecting contractual
519 relationships contains a material false statement or material
520 false information, and with intent to defraud, he or she
521 presents or offers it to a public office or a public employee,
522 with the knowledge that it will be registered, filed, or
523 recorded or will become a part of the records of that public
524 office or public employee.
525 (b) Offering a false instrument for recording is a
526 Class A misdemeanor.
527 (c) A person commits the crime of offering a false
528 instrument for recording against a public servant if the
529 person offers, for recording, a written instrument which that
530 relates to or affects the real or personal property, or an
531 interest therein, or a contractual relationship of a public
532 servant, knowing that the written instrument contains a
Page 19

servant, knowing that the written instrument contains a
HB426 Engrossed
533 materially false statement or materially false information,
534 with the intent to defraud, intimidate, or harass the public
535 servant, or to impede the public servant in the performance of
536 his or her duties. For the purposes of this subsection, public
537 servant is defined as in Section 13A-10-1.
538 (d) Offering a false instrument for recording against a
539 public servant is a Class C felony.
540 (e)(1) A recording official judge of probate may
541 nullify or expunge from an official record a false or
542 fraudulent lien, deed, or other instrument. A person or entity
543 whose rights are affected by the filing of a lien, deed, or
544 other instrument may petition a recording official judge of
545 probate to nullify or expunge the filing. If a lien, deed, or
546 other instrument is recorded with more than one recording
547 official judge of probate, then the petitioner may file such a
548 petition with any such recording official judge of probate,
549 but may file only one such petition, and any decision rendered
550 on that petition in accordance with the procedures outlined in
551 this subsection shall be equally applicable to all other
552 filings. Such The petition shall be in writing and sworn under
553 oath and based upon the personal knowledge of the petitioner.
554 A copy of such the petition shall be delivered via certified
555 and first class mail to the person or entity who filed the
556 lien, deed, or other instrument or who claims the rights or
557 interests thereby at an address shown on the lien, deed, or
558 other instrument.
559 (2) Within 14 days of the filing of such a petition
560 pursuant to subdivision (1), the recording official judge of
Page 20

pursuant to subdivision (1), the recording official judge of
HB426 Engrossed
561 probate shall give written notice of the filing of the
562 petition to the person or entity who filed the lien, deed, or
563 other instrument or who claims the rights or interests
564 thereby. Such The notice shall be sent by certified and first
565 class mail, shall be deemed delivered when placed in the mail,
566 and shall state that any additional proof of the validity of
567 the lien, deed or other instrument shall be filed with the
568 recording official judge of probate within 14 days of the date
569 of mailing the notice and that the failure to do so could
570 result in the lien, deed or other instrument being nullified
571 or expunged. The judge of probate's written notice may be
572 waived upon submission to the recording official of a written
573 waiver of notice, sworn to by the person who filed the false
574 or fraudulent lien, deed, or other instrument, or who claims
575 rights or interest under the document.
576 (3) If the recording official judge of probate does not
577 grant the petition within 28 days of the date that it is
578 filed, the petition shall be deemed denied. An order granting
579 or denying a petition, if rendered, shall be delivered to the
580 parties by the recording official judge of probate by
581 certified first class mail, but shall not be enforced, acted
582 upon, or effective before the expiration of 28 days from the
583 date of mailing or the final adjudication of any and all
584 appeals of that decision, at which time any final order
585 granting the petition shall be recorded and indexed in order
586 to provide notice that the lien, deed, or other instrument has
587 been nullified or expunged.
588 (4) A final order granting the petition shall: (i)
Page 21

(4) A final order granting the petition shall: (i)
HB426 Engrossed
589 state the names of the persons referenced in the false or
590 fraudulent lien, deed, or other instrument; (ii) state the
591 indexing and recording information for that lien, deed, or
592 other instrument; and (iii) declare that the false or
593 fraudulent lien, deed, or other instrument is nullified and
594 expunged.
595 (5) A party may appeal the decision of the recording
596 official judge of probate to the circuit court of any county
597 where the lien, deed, or other instrument was filed or to the
598 Circuit Court of Montgomery County, Alabama. Such appeals An
599 appeal must be filed within 28 days of the recording official
600 judge of probate's order or deemed denied. Such appeals
601 Appeals shall be filed and commenced as a civil action under
602 the Alabama Rules of Civil Procedure, which shall otherwise
603 apply to such actions on appeal. A notice of the appeal shall
604 also be filed with the recording official judge of probate,
605 who shall file the notice as a lis pendens filing. The appeal
606 shall be de novo by the circuit court without a jury. The
607 prevailing party on appeal shall be entitled to a judgement
608 against the other party for the prevailing party’s attorneys
609 fees and expenses arising out of and relating to the appeal,
610 and court costs shall be taxed against the non-prevailing
611 party. The remedy and procedure provided in this subsection is
612 not exclusive or mandatory. Nothing in this subsection shall
613 prevent the enforcement or challenge of any recorded lien or
614 instrument as may otherwise be allowed by law. Nothing in this
615 section alters or modifies any other requirements for the
616 filing, enforcement, or challenge of any lien, deed, or other
Page 22

filing, enforcement, or challenge of any lien, deed, or other
HB426 Engrossed
617 instrument required or allowed by law."
618 "§13A-9-22
619 (a) A person commits the crime of fraudulent sale or
620 lease of residential real property if, with intent to defraud,
621 he or she does either of the following:
622 (1) Lists or, advertises, or causes to list or
623 advertise residential real property for sale knowing that he
624 or she or the purported seller has no legal title or authority
625 to sell the property.
626 (2) Rents or, leases, or causes to rent or lease
627 residential real property to another person knowing that he or
628 she or the purported lessor has no legal ownership or other
629 authority to lease the property.
630 (b) Fraudulent sale or lease of residential real
631 property is a Class A misdemeanor D felony.
632 "§36-20-73
633 (a) Notaries public may do all of the following:
634 (1) Administer oaths in all matters incident to the
635 exercise of their office.
636 (2) Take the acknowledgment or proof of instruments of
637 writing relating to commerce or navigation and certify the
638 same and all other of their official acts under their seal of
639 office.
640 (3) Demand acceptance and payment of bills of exchange,
641 promissory notes, and all other writings which are governed by
642 the commercial law as to days of grace, demand, and notice of
643 nonpayment and protest the same for nonacceptance or
644 nonpayment and to give notice thereof as required by law.
Page 23

nonpayment and to give notice thereof as required by law.
HB426 Engrossed
645 (4) Exercise such other powers, according to commercial
646 usage or the laws of this state, as may belong to notaries
647 public.
648 (b) No notary public shall be obligated to perform a
649 notarial act if he or she has a reason to believe the act is:
650 (1) For a transaction that the notary public knows or
651 suspects is illegal, false, or deceptive;
652 (2) For an individual who is being coerced; or
653 (3) For an individual whose demeanor causes compelling
654 doubts as to whether the person knows the consequences of the
655 transaction requiring the notarial act."
656 "§36-20-73.1
657 (a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, any
658 signature acknowledged by a notary public shall be executed
659 within this state and shall be executed in the physical
660 presence of the notary public at the time of the
661 acknowledgment, only after the notary public has positively
662 identified the prospective signatory via personal knowledge of
663 the prospective signatory or the examination of photo
664 identification issued by a governmental entity or agency.
665 (b) For the purposes of this section, the following
666 terms shall have the following meanings:
667 (1) ORIGINAL SIGNATURE. A signature signed directly
668 onto a document in wet ink by an individual who is named on
669 the document.
670 (2) SIGNATORY. The individual who is named on the
671 document and is to sign the document.
672 (c) Unless otherwise provided by law, the powers and
Page 24

(c) Unless otherwise provided by law, the powers and
HB426 Engrossed
673 functions of a notary public require his or her original
674 signature.
675 (d) For purposes of this article, and subject to
676 subsections (e) to (g), inclusive, an individual may
677 personally appear before an acknowledging notary by either of
678 the following:
679 (1) Physically appearing before the notary as provided
680 in subsection (a).
681 (2) Appearing through the use of two-way audio-video
682 communication technology that allows a notary public and a
683 remotely located signatory to communicate with each other
684 simultaneously by sight and sound, provided that: (i) the
685 notary public is physically located in this state; and (ii)
686 the two-way audio-video communication is recorded and
687 maintained for a period of seven years by the notary public.
688 (e) All of the following shall occur prior to the
689 performance of a remote electronic notarial act:
690 (1) If appearing through the use of two-way audio-video
691 communication, theThe identity of the signatory shall be
692 verified by the notary public using either of the following
693 methods:
694 (1)a. The personal knowledge of the notary public of
695 the identity of the signatory.
696 (2)a.b.1. The presentation of two valid forms of
697 government issued identification, one of which shall include
698 the face and signature of the signatory; and.
699 b.2. A process by which the notary public verifies the
700 identity of the signatory through a review of public or
Page 25

identity of the signatory through a review of public or
HB426 Engrossed
701 private data sources.
702 (2) The remote notary shall verify that the remotely
703 located signatory does not appear, in the judgment of the
704 electronic notary, to be incompetent, lacking in understanding
705 of the nature and consequences of the transaction requiring
706 the notarial act, or acting involuntarily, under duress, or
707 under undue influence.
708 (3) The notary shall verify the identity of the
709 remotely located signatory pursuant to this section.
710 (4) The notary shall inform the participants that
711 Alabama law requires that a recording be made of the remote
712 electronic notarization.
713 (5) The remotely located signatory must be located
714 within the United State of America.
715 (f) TheA two-way audio-video communication recording
716 shall contain all of the following:
717 (1) The date and time of the remote notarial act.
718 (2) A description of the documents to which the remote
719 notarial act relates.
720 (3) An attestation by the notary public of being
721 physically located in this state.
722 (4) A description of how the identification of the
723 signatory was verified.
724 (5) A clear image of any government issued
725 identification, if applicable.
726 (6) A clear image of the act of signing observed by the
727 notary public.
728 (g) The official date and time of the notarization is
Page 26

(g) The official date and time of the notarization is
HB426 Engrossed
729 the date and time the notary public witnessed the signature,
730 including the date and time the signature was witnessed via
731 two-way audio-video communication technology. All documents
732 used during the two-way audio-video communication, shall be
733 provided to the notary public for his or her authentication
734 and original signature.
735 (h) An electronic notary shall refuse to perform a
736 remote electronic notarial act if either of the following
737 applies:
738 (1) The electronic notary has reasonable grounds to
739 believe the remotely located signatory appears in the judgment
740 of the electronic notary to be incompetent, lacking in
741 understanding of the nature and consequences of the
742 transaction requiring the notarial act, or acting
743 involuntarily, under duress, or under undue influence.
744 (2) The electronic notary becomes aware that the
745 communication technology is not secure or the image presented
746 of the signatory appears to be artificially generated.
747 (h)(i) Any action taken before July 1, 2021, allowing
748 for the remote notarization of signatures under the Emergency
749 Management Act of 1955, Article 1 of Chapter 9 of Title 31, is
750 ratified and confirmed.
751 (i)(j) Remote notarization may not be used to notarize
752 an absentee ballot application or an absentee ballot
753 affidavit, or for any purpose related to voting."
754 Section 5. This act shall become effective on October
755 1, 2026.
Page 27

1, 2026.
HB426 Engrossed
756
757
758 House of Representatives
759 Read for the first time and referred ................12-Feb-26
760 to the House of Representatives
761 committee on Judiciary
762
763 Read for the second time and placed ................11-Mar-26
764 on the calendar:
765 0 amendments
766
767 Read for the third time and passed ................17-Mar-26
768 as amended
769 Yeas 104
770 Nays 0
771 Abs 0
772
773
774 John Treadwell
775 Clerk
776
Page 28